Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.515, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Emergency importation to ensure adequate bait supply. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 5, section 97C.211 or 97C.341, or any other provision of law, a minnow dealer, minnow retailer, or holder of a private fish hatchery license may import live minnows from other states for use in this state without a permit when the minnow dealer, minnow retailer, or holder of a private fish hatchery is unable to procure an adequate supply of bait from sources in this state. For purposes of this subdivision, a person is unable to procure an adequate supply of bait from sources in this state if the person has an inadequate supply to meet demand for at least one day. new text end new text begin (b) A minnow dealer, minnow retailer, or holder of a private fish hatchery license must notify the commissioner within 48 hours of importing minnows under this subdivision in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may not require a permit to import minnows under this subdivision but may inspect any minnows imported under this subdivision and related documents to determine the quantity, source, species, and health of the imported minnows. new text end new text begin (d) Section 97C.341 does not apply to minnows imported under this subdivision. new text end